Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3509.01
Geologist-intern, defined.

Geologist-intern means a person who has been duly enrolled as a geologist-intern by the board.

Laws 2004, LB 890, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 9.